Utah statutes.
76-10-1214.   Conspiracy an offense -- Punishment.

(1)  A conspiracy of two or more persons to commit any offense proscribed by this part is a third degree felony  punishable for each separate offense by a minimum mandatory fine of not less than $1,000 and by imprisonment, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a term of not less than 60 days.  This subsection supersedes Section 77-18-1.

(2)  If a defendant has already been convicted once under this section, each separate further offense is a second degree felony punishable by a minimum mandatory fine of not less than $5,000 and by imprisonment, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a term of not less than one year.  This subsection supersedes Section 77-18-1.

